District of Columbia statutes.
42-517

Coparcenary estates abolished.

There shall be no estate in coparcenary in the District, and where 2 or more persons inherit from an intestate they shall be tenants in common.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1343, ch. 854, § 956
1981 Ed., § 45-217.
1973 Ed., § 45-817.